Arkansas, session 2025, HB1638.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The United States Space Force was established on December
20, 2019, and is the sixth branch of the United States Armed Forces and
eighth uniformed service of the United States under 10 U.S.C. § 101, as it
existed on January 1, 2025; and
(2) Arkansas legislation enacted after December 20, 2019,
includes the United States Space Force in statutory references to the United
States Armed Forces and uniformed services of the United States.
(b) The General Assembly intends for this act to:
(1) Add the United States Space Force to statutory references to
the United States Armed Forces and uniformed services of the United States
contained in existing statutes to ensure the eligibility of members and
*ZRC022*
03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
veterans of the United States Space Force for existing programs; and
(2) Modernize the language and provisions of statutes adopted
during or immediately following World War II.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-37-218(a), concerning the offense of
stolen valor, is amended to read as follows:
(a) As used in this section, “United States Armed Forces” means:
(1) Any branch regular or reserve component of the United States
Armed Forces Army, United States Navy, United States Air Force, United States
Marine Corps, United States Space Force, or United States Coast Guard; and
(2) The National Guard of any state.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-73-101, concerning the definitions
to be used in relation to offenses concerning weapons, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(15) "United States Armed Forces" means:
(A) Any regular or reserve component of the United States
Army, United States Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine
Corps, United States Space Force, or United States Coast Guard; and
(B) The National Guard of any state.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 5-73-105 is amended to read as follows:
5-73-105. Legitimate manufacture, repair, and transportation of
prohibited weapons.
Section 5-73-104 shall not be construed to prohibit the manufacture,
repair, transportation, or sale of the weapons enumerated in § 5-73-104 to or
for an authorized representative of:
(1) The armed forces United States Armed Forces; or
(2) Any law enforcement agency.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 5-73-119(e)(2) and (3), concerning
instances in which the possession of a handgun by a minor or on school
property is permissible, are amended to read as follows:
(2) The person is a law enforcement officer, correctional
officer, member of a municipal fire department bomb squad who is authorized
to carry a concealed handgun under § 12-15-204, or member of the armed forces
03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
United States Armed Forces acting in the course and scope of his or her
official duties;
(3) The person is assisting a law enforcement officer,
correctional officer, or member of the armed forces United States Armed
Forces acting in the course and scope of his or her official duties pursuant
to the direction or request of the law enforcement officer, correctional
officer, or member of the armed forces United States Armed Forces;

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 5-73-120(c)(2) and (3), concerning the
instances in which a person is presumed to be carrying a weapon with a lawful
purpose, are amended to read as follows:
(2) The person is a law enforcement officer, correctional
officer, member of a municipal fire department bomb squad who is authorized
to carry a concealed handgun under § 12-15-204, or member of the armed forces
United States Armed Forces, acting in the course and scope of his or her
official duties;
(3) The person is assisting a law enforcement officer,
correctional officer, or member of the armed forces United States Armed
Forces acting in the course and scope of his or her official duties pursuant
to the direction or request of the law enforcement officer, correctional
officer, or member of the armed forces United States Armed Forces;

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-4-302, Article II(R), concerning the
adoption of the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military
Children, is amended to read as follows:
R. “Uniformed service(s)” means: the Army, Navy,
Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, Coast Guard as well as the Commissioned
Corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, and Public
Health Services.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-17-306(b)(1), concerning a leave of
absence for a public school employee, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) A licensed employee or a classified employee who is employed by
a public school in this state is entitled to a leave of absence for fifteen
(15) days plus necessary travel time in any fiscal year for the purpose of
participating in:
03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
(A) Military training programs or other official duties
made available by the armed forces of this state or any other state,
including without limitation the National Guard or a reserve component of the
armed forces United States Armed Forces; or
(B) The civil defense and public health training programs
made available by the United States Commissioned Corps of the Public Health
Service.
(C) As used in this section, "United States Armed Forces"
means any regular or reserve component of the United States Army, United
States Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine Corps, United
States Space Force, or United States Coast Guard.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 7-1-101(36), concerning the definitions
used in relation to elections, is amended to read as follows:
(36) “Uniformed services” means the United States Army, United
States Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine Corps, United
States Space Force, United States Coast Guard, the United States Commissioned
Corps of the Public Health Service, and the National Oceanic and Atmospheric
Administration Commissioned Officer Corps, or as defined in the federal
Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. § 20301 et
seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025, if different from the definition
stated in this subdivision (36);

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 9-13-110(a)(1), concerning parents who are
members of the armed forces, is amended to read as follows:
(1) “Armed forces” means: the National Guard and the reserve
components of the armed forces, the United States Army, the United States
Navy, the United States Marine Corps, the United States Coast Guard, the
United States Air Force, and any other branch of the military and naval
forces or auxiliaries of the United States or Arkansas; and
(A) Any regular or reserve component of the United States
Army, United States Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine
Corps, United States Space Force, or United States Coast Guard;
(B) The National Guard of any state.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 9-21-102(18), concerning the definitions
03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
to be used in relation to the Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation
Act, is amended to read as follows:
(18) “Uniformed service” means:
(A) active and reserve components of the Army, Navy, Air
Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard of the United States;
(B) the United States Merchant Marine;
(C) the commissioned corps of the United States Public
Health Service;
(D) the commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and
Atmospheric Administration of the United States; or
(E) the National Guard of a state.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 12-60-102(13), concerning the definitions
to be used in relation to military affairs, is amended to read as follows:
(13) “Military” refers to any or all of means the armed forces,
including without limitation any regular or reserve component of the United
States Army, United States Navy, United States Air Force, United States
Marine Corps, United States Space Force, and United States Coast Guard;

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 12-60-102, concerning the definitions to
be used in relation to military affairs, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(22) "United States Armed Forces" means:
(A) Any regular or reserve component of the United States
Army, United States Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine
Corps, United States Space Force, and United States Coast Guard; and
(B) The National Guard of any state.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 12-61-108(c), concerning the appointment
of deputy adjutants general, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The deputy adjutants general must have a thorough knowledge of the
organization and missions of the departments and components of the armed
forces of the United States Armed Forces.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 12-61-110(b), concerning the property and
finance officer of the state militia, is amended to read as follows:
03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
(b) He or she shall be a citizen of the United States, a resident of
Arkansas, and shall have served on the active list as a commissioned officer
of either the Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, Space Force, or the
National Guard of this state.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 12-61-111(a)(2), concerning the power of
the Governor to order the state militia into service, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) Such power shall include the power to order the organized
militia or any part thereof to function under the operational control of the
United States Army, United States Navy, United States Space Force, or United
States Air Force commander in charge of the defense of any area within the
state.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 12-62-406 is amended to read as follows:
12-62-406. Stay of proceedings.
(a) All lawsuits pending in any court of this state in which any an
attorney for either party or any party is a member of the a reserve
components component of the armed forces United States Armed Forces and who
has been ordered to a period of active duty in the armed forces of the State
of Arkansas or of the United States, pursuant to a written order issued by
the authority of the President of the United States or the Governor of the
State of Arkansas, upon written notice to the parties and the court, shall be
stayed for a period of not less than fifteen (15) days preceding the period
of active duty and for thirty (30) days following the period of active duty,
unless for a time less as requested by the party or attorney. The proceedings
shall be stayed without regard to the number of other attorneys also
representing the parties litigant. Judgments, decrees, sentences, or fines
rendered or imposed in violation hereof after written notice for continuance
has been filed hereunder shall be void and unenforceable.
(b)(1) This section does not apply to any dependency-neglect actions.
(2) However, in dependency-neglect actions, a member of the
National Guard or reserve component of the armed forces of the United States
Armed Forces who has been ordered to a period of active duty in the armed
forces of the State of Arkansas or the United States pursuant to a written
order issued by the authority of the President of the United States or the
03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
Governor of the State of Arkansas shall be afforded the protections under the
Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. App. § 501 et seq., as in effect
on February 1, 2011, to the same extent as if his or her duties were for
federal military status.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 12-62-413(a), concerning employment
protections for members of the armed forces, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A person who is called to active state duty as a member of the
armed forces of this state or any other state, including without limitation
the National Guard, a reserve component of the armed forces, or the militia,
United States Armed Forces is afforded such employment and reemployment
rights, privileges, benefits, and protections in employment as though that
person had been called to active duty in the service of the United States and
shall not be denied hiring, retention in employment, promotion, or other
incidents or advantages of employment because of any obligation as a member
of the armed forces United States Armed Forces.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 12-62-802(5), concerning the definitions
to be used under the Military Service Protection Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(5) “Military service” means current honorable service or
honorable discharge from service within six (6) months from the date of the
alleged discrimination in any active or reserve component of the United
States Armed Forces armed forces; and

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 12-63-305(a)(1)(A), concerning the
conveyance or disposal of military real property, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1)(A) If the Adjutant General of the State of Arkansas determines
that any military reservation, armory, landing field, hangar, or any other
estate in real property owned or possessed by the State of Arkansas for the
use and benefit of the Arkansas National Guard or the armed forces of the
United States Armed Forces is no longer useful or necessary for National
Guard or other military purposes, the Adjutant General shall then have
authority to sell, convey, or otherwise dispose of the property.

03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 12-63-401(f), concerning the state's
acceptance of title to Camp Joseph T. Robinson, is amended to read as
follows:
(f) Such military training and support facilities, canteens, morale,
welfare, and recreational facilities, service clubs, and other facilities as
may be established and operated by the Adjutant General shall be operated in
accordance with applicable regulations of the United States armed forces
Armed Forces, subject to the orders, directions, regulations, and general
supervision of the Adjutant General, and subject to such restrictions and
requirements as provided by state law governing other military training
facilities, recreational facilities, and service clubs operated by the
Adjutant General.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 12-63-404(a), concerning military-type
canteens and exchanges, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Adjutant General, as custodian of military properties and
military reservations, may institute and operate military-type canteens and
exchanges similar to those operated by armed forces of the United States
Armed Forces on any military reservation, and he or she may designate
suitable buildings and lands located on a military reservation for the
operation of military-type canteens and exchanges.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 12-64-817(1)(A), concerning actions for
which military personnel shall be punished as directed by a court martial, is
amended to read as follows:
(1)(A) Violates or fails to obey any lawful order or rule. A
lawful order or rule is a written, electronic, nonverbal, or oral
communication by a member of the armed forces United States Armed Forces
acting within the scope of official military duties regarding instruction,
decision, rule, judgment, directive, procedure, statement, or command, and
which primarily affects the action, organization, training, good order,
discipline, property, welfare, administration, operation, and procedure of
the armed forces United States Armed Forces.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 12-64-824(7), concerning actions that
constitute misbehavior before the enemy by military personnel, is amended to
03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
read as follows:
(7) Causes false arms in any command, unit, or place under
control of the armed forces of the United States Armed Forces or the
organized militia;

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 12-64-841(3) and (4), concerning frauds
against the government, are amended to read as follows:
(3) Having charge, possession, custody, or control of any money
or other property of the United States or the state, furnished or intended
for the armed forces of the United States or the organized militia or any
force thereof United States Armed Forces, knowingly delivers to any person
having authority to receive it, any amount thereof less than that for which
he or she receives a certificate or receipt; or
(4) Being authorized to make or deliver any paper certifying the
receipt of any property of the United States or the state, furnished or
intended for the armed forces of the United States or the organized militia
or any force thereof United States Armed Forces, makes or delivers to any
person such writing without having full knowledge of the truth of the
statements therein contained and with intent to defraud the United States or
the state.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 12-64-851(a) and (b), concerning
prohibited activities by a person in a position of special trust, are amended
to read as follows:
(a) An officer, a noncommissioned officer, or a petty officer shall be
punished as a court-martial may direct for abuse of a training leadership
position if he or she:
(1) Is in a training leadership position with respect to a
specially protected junior member of the armed forces United States Armed
Forces; and
(2) Engages in prohibited sexual activity with the specially
protected junior member of the armed forces United States Armed Forces.
(b) A military recruiter shall be punished as a court-martial may
direct for abuse of a position as a military recruiter if he or she engages
in prohibited sexual activity with:
(1) An applicant he or she is recruiting to enlist in military
03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
service; or
(2) A specially protected junior member of the armed forces
United States Armed Forces who enlisted under a delayed entry program.

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code § 14-2-102(b), concerning records of
military discharges, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The record shall contain a complete copy of discharges and shall
contain an index of the names of the discharged soldiers, sailors, airmen,
marines Marines, or other members of the United States Army, United States
Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine Corps, United States
Space Force, United States Coast Guard, United States Merchant Marine,
members of the Women's Army Auxiliary Corps, Women's Reserve of the United
States Naval Reserve, nurses, and members of all other branches of the United
States Armed Forces with reference to page, alphabetically arranged.

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 16-47-213 is amended to read as follows:
16-47-213. Acknowledgments by persons serving in or with the armed
forces of the United States Armed Forces within or without the United States.
In addition to the acknowledgment of instruments in the manner and form
and as otherwise authorized by this act, persons a person serving in or with
the armed forces of the United States Armed Forces or their dependents his or
her dependent may acknowledge the same wherever located before any
commissioned officer in active service of the armed forces of the United
States Armed Forces with the rank of second lieutenant or higher in the
United States Army, United States Air Force, United States Space Force, or
United States Marine Corps, or ensign or higher in the United States Navy or
United States Coast Guard. The instrument shall not be rendered invalid by
the failure to state therein the place of execution or acknowledgment. No
authentication of the officer's certificate of acknowledgment shall be
required but the officer taking the acknowledgment shall endorse thereon or
attach thereto a certificate substantially in the following form: “On this
............. day of ............. , 19 20............., before me,
............., the undersigned officer, personally appeared .............
(Serial No. .............) known to me or satisfactorily proven to be
(serving in or with the armed forces of the United States Armed Forces) (a
dependent of ............., (Serial No. .............) a person serving in or
03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
with the armed forces of the United States Armed Forces) and to be the person
whose name is subscribed to the within instrument and acknowledged that
............. he or she ............. executed the same for the purposes
therein contained. And the undersigned does further certify that he or she is
at the date of this certificate a commissioned officer of the rank stated
below and is in the active service of the armed forces of the United States
Armed Forces.
............................................
Signature of the Officer
............................................
Rank and Serial No. of Officer
and Command to which attached."

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code § 16-56-118 is amended to read as follows:
16-56-118. Suspension of limitations — Persons in the armed forces
United States Armed Forces.
(a) The statutes of limitations in this state are suspended so far as
those statutes affect the claim or cause of action of a person in the armed
forces of the United States Armed Forces during the existence of a state of
war between the United States and any other nation, and for six (6) months
thereafter.
(b) Any person in the armed forces of the United States Armed Forces
during the existence of a state of war between the United States and any
other nation may, at any time within one (1) year after the end of the state
of war and six (6) months thereafter, maintain a suit for the collection of
any debt or the recovery of any real or personal property to which the person
may be entitled if the statute of limitations had not run against the action
prior to the person's entry into the armed forces of the United States Armed
Forces.
(c) As used in this section, "United States Armed Forces" means:
(1) Any regular or reserve component of the United States Army,
United States Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine Corps,
United States Space Force, or United States Coast Guard; and
(2) The National Guard of any state.

SECTION 30. Arkansas Code § 16-112-118(a)(1), concerning who may be
03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
discharged under a writ of habeas corpus, is amended to read as follows:
(1) Who is in custody or held by virtue of any legal engagement
or enlistment in the United States Army, or the United States Navy, United
States Marine Corps, United States Air Force, United States Space Force, or
United States Coast Guard;

SECTION 31. Arkansas Code § 17-1-101(a) and (b), concerning the
examination credit for United States veterans and nurses on examinations held
by state boards, commissions, or bureaus for the purpose of examining
applicants for a license or permit to engage in a profession, trade, or
employment, are amended to read as follows:
(a) In all examinations held by any and all state boards, commissions,
or bureaus for the purpose of examining applicants for any license or permit
to engage in any profession, trade, or employment, all applicants for such
examinations who are veterans of the United States Army, United States Navy,
United States Air Force, United States Marine Corps, United States Space
Force, United States Coast Guard, or Nurses of the United States shall have a
credit of ten percent (10%) over and above all applicants who are not such
veterans or nurses.
(b) The only requirement on the part of the applicant for examination
to secure credit of ten percent (10%) shall be the delivery to the examining
board, commission, or bureau of the original or a duly and properly executed
certified copy of an honorable discharge from the United States Army, United
States Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine Corps, United
States Space Force, United States Coast Guard, or Nurses of the United
States.

SECTION 32. Arkansas Code § 17-20-103(a), concerning exemptions to the
Arkansas Barber Law, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The following persons, firms, or corporations are exempt from the
provisions under this chapter while in the proper discharge of their
professional duties:
(1) Persons licensed by the laws of this state to practice the
healing arts;
(2) Commissioned medical or surgical officers of the uniformed
services of the United States Army, United States Navy, or United States
03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
Commissioned Corps of the Public Health Service;
(3) Persons licensed or registered by the Arkansas State Board
of Nursing;
(4) Undertakers and morticians; and
(5) Jails, prisons, or penitentiaries.

SECTION 33. Arkansas Code § 17-82-302(1), concerning acts and
practices that do not require a person to be licensed as a dentist, dental
hygienist, or dental assistant, is amended to read as follows:
(1) The performance of duty in this state of a commissioned
dental or medical officer of the United States Army, United States Air Force,
United States Navy, United States Coast Guard, United States Department of
Veterans Affairs, or United States Public Health Service;

SECTION 34. Arkansas Code § 17-83-104(2), concerning exemptions from
the laws concerning the licensing of dietitians, is amended to read as
follows:
(2)(A) A dietitian who is serving in the armed forces United
States Armed Forces or the United States Public Health Service or is employed
by the Department of Veterans Affairs from engaging in the practice of
dietetics, provided that the practice is related to that service or
employment;.
(B) As used in this subdivision (2), "United States Armed
Forces" means:
(i) Any regular or reserve component of the United
States Army, United States Navy, United States Air Force, United States
Marine Corps, United States Space Force, or United States Coast Guard; and
(ii) The National Guard of any state;

SECTION 35. Arkansas Code § 17-96-102 is amended to read as follows:
17-96-102. Exemptions.
This chapter shall not apply to physicians or surgeons licensed in the
State of Arkansas, nor to the surgeons of the United States Army, the United
States Navy, the United States Air Force, and the United States Public Health
Service, when in actual performance of their duties.

03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
SECTION 36. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1095(b)(1)(B), concerning the
Military Support Revolving Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(B) All moneys received by the Department of the Military
from the United States Army, the United States Air Force, the United States
Navy, the United States Marine Corps, the United States Space Force, the
United States Coast Guard, foreign allied governments, and reserve forces of
the United States, allied nations, and other federal agencies; and

SECTION 37. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1127(c), concerning the Military
Family Relief Trust Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively by the Adjutant General or his
or her designee to assist members and families of members of the Arkansas
National Guard and reserve components of the armed forces United States Army,
United States Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine Corps,
United States Space Force, and United States Coast Guard.

SECTION 38. Arkansas Code § 20-64-205(2)(b), concerning the sale on
written orders of narcotics under the Uniform Narcotic Drug Act, is amended
to read as follows:
(b) To a master of a ship or a person in charge of any aircraft
upon which no physician is regularly employed, or to a physician or surgeon
duly licensed in some state, territory, or the District of Columbia, to
practice his or her profession, or to a retired commissioned medical officer
of the United States Army, the United States Navy, the United States Air
Force, the United States Marine Corps, the United States Space Force, the
United States Coast Guard, or the United States Public Health Service
employed upon such ship or aircraft, for the actual medical needs of persons
on board of such ship or aircraft, when not in port. Provided: Such narcotic
drugs shall be sold to the master of such ship or person in charge of such
aircraft or to a physician, surgeon, or retired commissioned medical officer
of the United States Army, the United States Navy, the United States Air
Force, the United States Coast Guard, or the United States Public Health
Service employed upon such ship or aircraft only in pursuance of a special
order form approved by a commissioned medical officer or acting assistant
surgeon of the United States Public Health Service;

03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
SECTION 39. Arkansas Code § 20-64-205(5), concerning the sale on
written orders of narcotics under the Uniform Narcotic Drug Act, is amended
to read as follows:
(5) A person in charge of a hospital or of a laboratory, or in the
employ of this state or of any other state, or of any political subdivisions
thereof, or a master of a ship or a person in charge of any aircraft upon
which no physician is regularly employed, or a physician or surgeon duly
licensed in some state, territory, or the District of Columbia, to practice
his or her profession, or a retired commissioned medical officer of the
United States Army, the United States Navy, the United States Air Force, the
United States Coast Guard, or the United States Public Health Service
employed upon such ship or aircraft who obtains narcotic drugs under the
provisions of this section or otherwise, shall not administer nor dispense
nor otherwise use such drugs, within this state, except within the scope of
his or her employment or official duty, and then only for scientific or
medicinal purposes and subject to the provisions of this subchapter.

SECTION 40. Arkansas Code § 21-2-105(b), concerning the administration
of oaths for public officers and employees, is amended to read as follows:
(b) However, if the officer is serving in or with the United States
Armed Forces, he or she may take the oath of office before any commissioned
officer in active service of the United States Armed Forces with the rank of
second lieutenant or higher in the United States Army, United States Air
Force, United States Space Force, or United States Marine Corps, or ensign or
higher in the United States Navy or United States Coast Guard.

SECTION 41. Arkansas Code § 21-4-301(4), concerning definitions
related to military leaves of absence, is amended to read as follows:
(4) “Person in military service” and “persons in the military
service of the United States” shall include the following persons and no
others:
(A) All members of the United States Army, United States
Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine Corps, United States
Space Force, and United States Coast Guard; and
(B) All officers of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric
Administration Commissioned Officer Corps and United States Commissioned
03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
Corps of the United States Public Health Service detailed by proper authority
for duty with either the Untied States Army or the United States Navy the
United States Armed Forces under subdivision (4)(A) of this section.

SECTION 42. Arkansas Code § 23-64-302(9), concerning exemptions from
continuing education requirements for insurance licensees, is amended to read
as follows:
(9)(A) A member of the Arkansas National Guard on state active
duty or a member of the United States Armed Forces on active duty., including
without limitation an active duty member of the:
(A) United States Coast Guard; or
(B) Reserve components of the United States Armed Forces.
As used in this section, "United States Armed Forces"
means:
(i) A regular or reserve component of the United
States Army, United States Navy, United States Air Force, United States
Marine Corps, United States Space Force, or United States Coast Guard; and
(ii) The National Guard of any state.

SECTION 43. Arkansas Code § 24-2-503(a), concerning the Arkansas
National Guard and armed forces reserve service credit under public employee
retirement plans, is amended to read as follows:
(a) As used in this section, "armed forces reserve" means one (1) of
the reserve components a reserve component of the United States Armed Forces
United States Army,United States Navy, United States Air Force, United States
Marine Corps, United States Space Force, or United States Coast Guard.

SECTION 44. Arkansas Code § 24-4-501(b), concerning prior service
credit under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) Any active member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement
System who would otherwise be eligible for free prior service credit under
the provisions of this chapter because of employment with a public employer
or with the public schools but who was drafted and was serving in the
military United States Armed Forces on active duty on a date which would have
made the member eligible for the free prior service had the member been an
03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
employee on that date shall receive, upon application and submission of
proper proof to the board, free prior service credit for employment prior to
July 1, 1957, in the case of a state, municipal, or school employee, or prior
to July 1, 1959, in the case of a county employee, if the following
conditions are met:
(1) The member was an employee of a public employer immediately
preceding his or her involuntary service in the armed forces United States
Armed Forces; and
(2) The member was reemployed as an employee within six (6)
months of his or her discharge from the United States Armed Forces.

SECTION 45. Arkansas Code § 24-4-501, concerning prior service credit
under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(d) As used in this section, "United States Armed Forces" means:
(1) Any regular or reserve component of the United States Army,
United States Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine Corps,
United States Space Force, or United States Coast Guard; and
(2) The National Guard of any state.

SECTION 46. Arkansas Code § 24-6-104(a), concerning credit for service
in the National Guard and armed forces reserve for the purposes of state
police retirement, is amended to read as follows:
(a) As used in this section, “armed forces reserve” means one (1) of
the reserve components of the United States Armed Forces United States Army,
United States Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine Corps,
United States Space Force, or United States Coast Guard.

SECTION 47. Arkansas Code § 24-7-610(a), concerning credit for service
in the National Guard and armed forces reserve for the purpose of the
Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, is amended to read as follows:
(a) As used in this section, “armed forces reserve” means one (1) of
the reserve components of the United States Armed Forces United States Army,
United States Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine Corps,
United States Space Force, or United States Coast Guard.

03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
SECTION 48. Arkansas Code § 26-51-306(c)(2) and (3), concerning the
definitions used in relation to the income tax exemption for compensation and
benefits from military service, are amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) “Armed forces” means the United States Army, United
States Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine Corps, United
States Space Force, and United States Coast Guard, the National Guard, and
the reserve components of the United States Army, United States Navy, United
States Air Force, United States Marine Corps, United States Space Force, and
United States Coast Guard.
(B) “Armed forces” does not include:
(i) A military technician (dual status) under 10
U.S.C. § 10216(a)(1), as it existed on January 1, 2019;
(ii) The National Oceanic and Atmospheric
Administration Commissioned Officer Corps; or
(iii) The United States Commissioned Corps of the
Public Health Service; and
(3) “Armed services” means includes the National Guard of any
state, reserve components of the armed forces, United States Army, United
States Navy, United States Marine Corps, United States Coast Guard, United
States Air Force, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration
Commissioned Officer Corps, and United States Commissioned Corps of the
Public Health Service.

SECTION 49. Arkansas Code § 26-51-307(e)(2), concerning the income tax
exemption for retirement and disability benefits, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) As used in this subsection, “member of the uniformed
services” means a retired member of any of the following:
(A) The United States Army, the United States Marine
Corps, the United States Navy, the United States Air Force, the United States
Space Force, or the United States Coast Guard;
(B) A reserve component of any of the United States Armed
Forces listed in subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section;
(C) The National Guard of any state;
(D) The commissioned regular or reserve corps of the
United States Public Health Service; or
03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
(E) The National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration
Commissioned Officer Corps.

SECTION 50. Arkansas Code § 26-51-2506(i), concerning the Military
Family Relief Check-off Program, is amended to read as follows:
(i)(1) The Adjutant General or his or her designee shall use funds
from the Military Family Relief Trust Fund to establish a grant program to
assist the families of members of the National Guard and the reserve
components of the armed forces United States Armed Forces.
(2)(A) The grant program created under this section shall assist
members and families of members of the National Guard and the reserve
components of the armed forces United States Armed Forces.
(B) The eligibility criteria for receiving grants under
the grant program shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
(i) The need of the family;
(ii) The pay grade of the member of the National
Guard and reserve components of the armed forces United States Armed Forces;
(iii) The difference between the member's military
salary and civilian salary; or
(iv) Any other factors that establish the family's
financial hardship.
(3) As used in this section, "United States Armed Forces" means
the United States Army, United States Navy, United States Air Force, United
States Marine Corps, United States Space Force, or United States Coast Guard.


SECTION 51. Arkansas Code § 27-14-704(a)(4), concerning the operation
of motor vehicles registered in foreign states, is amended to read as
follows:
(4) The secretary is authorized and empowered to enter into any
agreement or issue any permit for the operation of any motor vehicles upon
the highways of this state without payment of license fees when the motor
vehicles are operated under and by the supervision of the proper authorities
of the United States Army, United States Air Force, United States Navy, or
United States Marine Corps, United States Space Force, or United States Coast
Guard during any period of emergency.
03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638

SECTION 52. Arkansas Code § 27-16-603(1), concerning persons exempted
from the licensing requirements for the operation of motor vehicles, is
amended to read as follows:
(1) A person who operates a motor vehicle for a military
purpose:
(A) While in the service of the:
(i) United States Army, United States Air Force,
United States Navy, United States Space Force, United States Coast Guard, or
United States Marine Corps; or
(ii) National Guard and reserve components of the
armed forces; or
(B) While serving as a National Guard military technician;

SECTION 53. Arkansas Code § 27-24-203(6), concerning the definitions
to be used under the Special License Plate Act of 2005, is amended to read as
follows:
(6) “Retired member of the armed forces United States Armed
Forces” means a person who presents proof of retirement in the form of
retirement orders issued by one (1) of the following services of the United
States Armed Forces:
(A) The United States Army;
(B) The United States Navy;
(C) The United States Marine Corps;
(D) The United States Air Force;
(E) The United States Space Force;
(F) The United States Coast Guard;
(F)(G) The Army National Guard;
(G)(H) The Air National Guard; or
(H)(I) The reserve components of the United States Armed
Forces;

SECTION 54. Arkansas Code § 27-24-209(c)(1), concerning the redesign
and simplification of military service and veterans special license plates,
is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) The Office of Motor Vehicle shall design a branch decal based
03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
on the official emblem for each of the following:
(A) The United States Army;
(B) The United States Army Reserve;
(C) The United States Navy;
(D) The United States Navy Reserve;
(E) The United States Marine Corps;
(F) The United States Marine Corps Reserve;
(G) The United States Air Force;
(H) The United States Air Force Reserve;
(I) The United States Coast Guard;
(J) The United States Coast Guard Reserve;
(K) The United States Space Force;
(L) The United States Space Force Reserve;
(K)(M) The Army National Guard; and
(L)(N) The Air National Guard.

SECTION 55. Arkansas Code § 27-24-210(a), concerning the special
license plate for retired members of the armed forces, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) The Department of Finance and Administration shall continue the
special license plate for a retired members member of the armed forces United
States Armed Forces that existed before the July 31, 2009.

SECTION 56. Arkansas Code § 27-24-1313(a), concerning special license
plates for United States veterans, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Department of Finance and Administration shall create for
issuance a special license plate that bears a decal stating “U. S. Veteran”
to be issued to an eligible applicant who establishes that he or she has
served in the:
(1) United States Army;
(2) United States Navy;
(3) United States Marine Corps;
(4) United States Air Force;
(5) United States Space Force;
(6) United States Coast Guard;
(6)(7) Army National Guard; or
03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1638
(7)(8) Air National Guard.

/s/Painter

































03-18-2025 10:45:34 ZRC022